New York, session 2025-2026, S1469.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph c of subdivision 1 of section 3602 of the educa- 2 tion law, as amended by section 5 of part A of chapter 56 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 c. "Actual valuation" shall mean the valuation of taxable real proper- 5 ty in a school district obtained by taking the assessed valuation of 6 taxable real property within such district as it appears upon the 7 assessment roll of the town, city, village, or county in which such 8 property is located, for the calendar year two years prior to the calen- 9 dar year in which the base year commenced, after revision as provided by 10 law, plus any assessed valuation that was exempted from taxation pursu- 11 ant to the class one reassessment exemption authorized by section four 12 hundred eighty-five-u of the real property tax law or the residential 13 revaluation exemption authorized by section four hundred eighty-five-v 14 of such law as added by chapter five hundred sixty of the laws of two 15 thousand twenty-one, and dividing it by the state equalization rate as 16 determined by the commissioner of taxation and finance, for the assess- 17 ment roll of such town, city, village, or county completed during such 18 preceding calendar year; provided, however, that the actual valuation of 19 a school district shall not include the valuation of any real property 20 within a state forest preserve that is either in the Adirondack park or 21 the Catskill park. The actual valuation of a central high school 22 district shall be the sum of such valuations of its component districts. 23 Such actual valuation shall include any actual valuation equivalent of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04505-01-5 S. 1469 2 1 payments in lieu of taxes determined pursuant to section four hundred 2 eighty-five of the real property tax law. "Selected actual valuation" 3 shall mean the lesser of actual valuation calculated for aid payable in 4 the current year or the two-year average of the actual valuation calcu- 5 lated for aid payable in the current year and the actual valuation 6 calculated for aid payable in the base year. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 8 the date on which it shall have become a law.